Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.050

Escrow or impoundment of franchise fees as registration condition—Rules or orders—Procedure to rescind.

The director may by rule or order require as a condition to the effectiveness of the registration the escrow or impound of franchise fees if he or she finds that such requirement is necessary and appropriate to protect prospective franchisees. At any time after the issuance of such rule or order under this section the franchisor may in writing request the rule or order be rescinded. Upon receipt of such a written request, the matter shall be set down for hearing to commence within fifteen days after such receipt unless the person making the request consents to a later date. After such hearing, which shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, the director shall determine whether to affirm and to continue or to rescind such order and the director shall have all powers granted under such act.

[ 2011 c 336 s 558; 1972 ex.s. c 116 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 5.]